Hawaii statutes.
§321-232 Revenues; deposit into state
general fund. (a) The department of health shall establish reasonable
fees for services rendered to the public by the department of health, any
county, or private agency under this part; provided that all such revenues
which shall be collected by the department of health and the respective
counties shall be deposited into the state general fund, except such amounts
necessary to provide for collection services for bad debt accounts. Fees
required to be set by this section shall be established in accordance with
chapter 91.

(b) No ambulance services, or any other
emergency medical services available from or under the authority of this
chapter shall be denied to any person on the basis of the ability of the person
to pay therefor or because of the lack of prepaid health care coverage or proof
of such ability or coverage.

(c) In the event of nonpayment of any fees
required to be assessed by this section, the department of health shall
determine whether the recipient of such services is financially able to pay
such fees and make every reasonable effort to collect such fees. In the event
the department finds the person is without sufficient resources to pay for the
services, no further action to collect the fees shall be taken. If the
services are paid by a county or any other entity, and collection of such fee
is delegated by contractual agreement to the county or other agency which
provides the services, the county or other agency shall forward records
relating to unpaid fees for action by the department of health under this
subsection. No county or other entity shall make a final determination of the
ability of a person to pay under this subsection. Any determination of ability
to pay for purposes of this subsection shall be in accordance with rules which
the department of health shall adopt, subject to chapter 91, governing such
determinations. [L 1978, c 148, pt of §1; am L 1984, c 77, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next